Utah statutes.
79-4-206.   Support of a nonprofit corporation or foundation.

The division may provide administrative support to a nonprofit corporation or foundation that assists the board and the division in attaining the objectives outlined in the strategic or operational plan.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

